Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-865
Nebraska Student Loan Assistance Program; loans; how funded.

Any loan made or caused to be made or purchased pursuant
to section 58-864 may be funded with
the proceeds of bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority issued
pursuant to this section and sections 58-841,
58-846, 58-863, and 58-864. The resolution
or trust indenture creating such bonds, notes, or other obligations
may contain any of the provisions specified in section 58-843 as
the authority deems appropriate and any other provisions, not in violation
of law, as the authority deems reasonable and proper for the security of the
holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations.

The proceeds of any such bonds, notes, or other obligations
may be used and applied by the authority to make loans to such institutions
and cause loans to be made by the institutions to their qualified students,
to pay financing costs, including legal, underwriting, investment banking,
accounting, rating agency, printing, and other similar costs, to fund any
reserve funds deemed necessary or advisable by the authority, to pay interest
on such bonds, notes, or other obligations for any period deemed necessary
or advisable by the authority, and to pay all other necessary and incidental
costs and expenses.

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2963;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 62;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1762;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 65.